Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2068
Internationally trained physician; unrestricted license; eligibility; physician; provide information, when.

(1) After an internationally trained physician has practiced under a provisional license for a minimum of three years and a transitional license for a minimum of three years, such physician shall be eligible to apply for an unrestricted license to practice medicine in this state. Prior to granting such unrestricted license, the board shall review and evaluate assessment data and reports submitted under sections 38-2066 and 38-2067.

(2) While practicing under a provisional or transitional license, the physician shall submit the following information to the department and the board every six months or upon request: (a) A statement certifying that the physician is employed as a physician in this state and not subject to discipline; and (b) a disclosure of the results of any assessment or evaluation completed by the participating health care entity under an approved assessment and evaluation program pursuant to section 38-2067.

(3) The physician shall notify the department and the board of any changes in employment during the period of time a provisional license is in effect.

Laws 2026, LB1212, § 6.
August 1, 2027